Hawaii statutes.
§121-42 No pay without orders. No
officer or enlisted member of the army or air national guard shall be entitled
to receive the pay herein provided unless the orders detailing the officer or
enlisted member for duty or subsequent orders, specify that pay is to be
received for the service rendered. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS §121-42; am L
1969, c 15, §1(c); gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next